Washington statutes.
RCW 35.89.030

Bonds exchange—Subrogation.

Water redemption bonds issued under the authority of this chapter shall only be sold or disposed of in exchange for an equal amount in par value of principal and interest of the local improvement district bonds issued for the construction of water systems taken over and operated by the city or town, or incorporated into or connected with a water system operated by it.

Upon the exchange of the water redemption bonds authorized by this chapter for local improvement district bonds the city or town shall be subrogated to all the rights of the owners and holders of such local improvement district bonds against the property of the local improvement district and against any person or corporation liable thereon.

Any money derived by the city or town from the sale or enforcement of such local improvement district bonds shall be paid into the city's water redemption fund.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.89.030. Prior: 1923 c 52 s 3; RRS s 9154-3.]